Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1749.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 34-109 of Title 11, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, "law enforcement agency" shall mean
the police department of any municipality.
B. 1. A law enforcement agency shall equip each vehicle used
in a canine law enforcement program with a heat alarm system that is
activated when the vehicle stops running or the temperature in the
vehicle's interior exceeds eighty-five (85) degrees Fahrenheit.
2. The system, when activated, must:
a. activate an audible alarm;
Req. No. 10392 Page 1

b. automatically lower the vehicle's rear windows; and
c. notify the canine law enforcement officer of the
dangerous situation.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 566 of Title 19, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, "law enforcement agency" shall mean
the police department of any county sheriff's department.
B. 1. A law enforcement agency shall equip each vehicle used
in a canine law enforcement program with a heat alarm system that is
activated when the vehicle stops running or the temperature in the
vehicle's interior exceeds eighty-five degrees (85) Fahrenheit.
2. The system, when activated, must:
a. activate an audible alarm;
b. automatically lower the vehicle's rear windows; and
c. notify the canine law enforcement officer of the
dangerous situation.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9301 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, "law enforcement agency" shall mean
any police department with statewide jurisdiction as well as any
university or college campus police.

Req. No. 10392 Page 2

B. 1. A law enforcement agency shall equip each vehicle used
in a canine law enforcement program with a heat alarm system that is
activated when the vehicle stops running or the temperature in the
vehicle's interior exceeds eighty-five (85) degrees Fahrenheit.
2. The system, when activated, must:
a. activate an audible alarm;
b. automatically lower the vehicle's rear windows; and
c. notify the canine law enforcement officer of the
dangerous situation.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10392 JL 01/08/25












Req. No. 10392 Page 3